Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3807
Minor in custody of department; birth certificate; application.

The department may obtain a birth certificate from the appropriate country for a foreign national minor or a minor having multiple nationalities in the custody of the department. The department may request the assistance of the consulate in obtaining the necessary documentation to complete the application for a birth certificate under this section.

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB92, § 7.